Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licensure Requirements

§ 531.
License by examination.

To be eligible for licensure under this section, an applicant shall satisfy all of the following requirements:

Have attained the age of majority.

Present proof of having graduated from a four-year school of chiropractic, accredited by a chiropractic accrediting body recognized by the U.S. Department of Education and approved by the Board, or submit to the Board proof of equivalent education as provided in rules for foreign-trained persons.

Pass the examinations required by section 532 of this title, which shall be administered in the manner and places designated by the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 52

, § 8;

2003, No. 60

, § 5.

§ 532.
Examinations.

The Board, or an examination service selected by the Board, shall examine applicants for licensure. The examinations may include the following subjects: anatomy, physiology, physiotherapy, diagnosis, hygiene, orthopedics, histology, pathology, neurology, chemistry, bacteriology, x-ray interpretation, x-ray technic and radiation protection, and principles of chiropractic. The Board may use a standardized national examination.

In addition to the examination required by subsection (a) of this section, an applicant shall demonstrate proficiency in vertebral palpation, and spinal adjustment and may also be required to demonstrate proficiency in the practical application of orthopedics, neurology, x-ray interpretation and principles of ionizing radiation, laboratory diagnosis, and clinical diagnosis as they relate to the practice of chiropractic.

Licensing standards and procedures shall be fair and reasonable and shall be designed and implemented to measure and reasonably ensure that all applicants are granted licensure if they demonstrate that they possess the minimum qualifications that are consistent with protecting the public health, safety, and welfare.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 533.
License by endorsement.

The Board may grant a license without written examination to an applicant who is licensed and is in good standing to practice chiropractic in another jurisdiction of the United States or Canada with standards and qualifications required for licensure of chiropractors that are deemed by the Board to be substantially equivalent to those required by this chapter.

The Board may require an applicant under this section to take an examination on the Vermont laws and rules governing the practice of chiropractic.

An applicant who is not in good standing may be eligible for licensure under this section if the applicant can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Board that the applicant has passed the Special Purpose Examination for Chiropractors and is otherwise qualified for licensure under this section. The Board may place limitations or conditions on licenses issued under this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. June 27, 2002;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 534.
License renewal.

Licenses shall be renewed every two years upon application and payment of the required fee. Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall result in suspension of all privileges granted by the license beginning on the expiration date of the license. A license that has lapsed shall be renewed upon payment of the biennial renewal fee and the late renewal penalty.

The Board may adopt rules necessary for the protection of the public to assure the Board that an applicant whose license has lapsed for more than three years is professionally qualified before the license is renewed. Conditions imposed under this subsection shall be in addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.

In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, an applicant for renewal shall have satisfactorily completed continuing education as required by the Board. For purposes of this subsection, the Board may require, by rule, not more than 24 hours of approved continuing education as a condition of renewal.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 27

, § 33;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 535.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following fees:

Chiropractors (A) Application $ 200.00 (B) Biennial renewal $ 265.00 (C) Initial competency endorsement under section 525 of this title $ 70.00 (D) Biennial renewal of competency endorsement under section 525 of this title $ 70.00 (E) Evaluation $ 125.00 (2) Registration of intern $ 50.00

Click to view

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

1999, No. 49

, § 171;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. June 21, 2002;

2005, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2013, No. 191

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 536.
Registration of chiropractic interns.

A student enrolled in a chiropractic college approved by the Board, who has completed three years of the curriculum, may work as a chiropractic intern provided he or she is registered with the Board. A registered intern shall work under the direct supervision of a licensed chiropractor. An intern may perform activities delegated to him or her by the supervising chiropractor, including the activities described in subdivision 521(3) of this title, provided that a licensed chiropractor observes all such activities. The supervising chiropractor shall be legally liable for such activities performed by the intern.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.